District of Columbia statutes.
21-107

Preferences in appointment of guardian of estate.

In appointing a guardian of the estate of an infant, unless said infant be over 14 years of age as hereinafter directed in section 21-108 , the court shall give preference to —

(1)

the parents, or either of them, if living; or

(2)

the spouse if the infant is married to a person 18 years of age or older —

when in the judgment of the court the parent or spouse is a suitable person to have the management of the infant’s estate.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 738, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 28, 23 DCR 2544
1981 Ed., § 21-107.
1973 Ed., § 21-107.